Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2704.01
Grants of assistance; purposes; applications; evaluation.

(1) The department shall use the fund to provide grants of assistance for the following purposes:

(a) To assist in the construction of new civic centers and recreation centers or the renovation or expansion of existing civic centers and recreation centers;

(b) To assist in the preservation, restoration, conversion, rehabilitation, demolition, or reuse of historic buildings or districts; or

(c) To assist in the construction or upgrade of public spaces, including the demolition of property.

(2) Applications for grants of assistance pursuant to this section shall be evaluated by the department pursuant to section 13-2707.

Laws 2013, LB153, § 5;

Laws 2018, LB379, § 3;

Laws 2018, LB940, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB564, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB883, § 2.
July 18, 2026